Washington statutes.
RCW 6.17.080

Enforcement of judgment against local governmental entity.

No execution may issue for collection of a judgment for the recovery of money or damages against a local governmental entity. Any such judgment may be enforced as follows:

(1) The judgment creditor may at any time when execution might issue on a like judgment against a private person, and after acknowledging satisfaction of the judgment as in ordinary cases, obtain from the clerk a certified transcript of the judgment. The clerk shall include in the transcript a copy of the memorandum of acknowledgment of satisfaction and the entry thereof as the basis for an order on the treasurer for payment. Unless the transcript contains such memorandum, no order upon the treasurer shall issue thereon.

(2) The judgment creditor shall present the certified transcript showing satisfaction of the judgment to the officer of the local governmental entity who is authorized to draw orders on its treasury.

(3) The officer shall draw an order on the treasurer for the amount of the judgment, in favor of the judgment creditor. The order shall be presented for payment and paid with like effect and in like manner as other orders upon the treasurer. If the proper officer of the local governmental entity fails or refuses to draw the order for payment of the judgment as provided in this section, a writ of mandamus may be issued in the original case to compel performance of the duty.

(4) As used in this section, the term "local governmental entity" means a county, city, town, special district, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation.

[ 1993 c 449 s 6; 1987 c 442 s 408; Code 1881 s 664; 1877 p 137 s 667; 1869 p 154 s 604; RRS s 953. Formerly RCW 6.04.140.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Severability—1993 c 449: See notes following RCW 4.96.010.